District of Columbia statutes.
47-4702

Annual certification of continuing eligibility for exemptions and abatements from real property tax.

(a)

To the extent allowable by law, on or before April 1 of each year, beginning in 2012, and every year thereafter, any nonprofit organization or business entity owning property receiving a real property tax exemption or abatement pursuant to Chapter 10 (other than property exempt under § 47-1002(1), (2), (3), or (21)) or Chapter 46 of this title, regardless of when the exemption or abatement was received, shall be required to file an annual report, under oath, with the Office of the Chief Financial Officer providing:

(1)

The lot and square, parcel, or reservation number of the real property and certifying that the real property has been used during the preceding real property tax year for the purpose for which the exemption or abatement was granted; and

(2)

A description of the community benefits provided pursuant to the provisions of the act granting the tax exemption or abatement, or an update on the progress of the community benefits identified in the act granting the tax exemption or abatement.

(b)

Failure to certify that the property was still eligible for the exemption or abatement based on the use of the property as required by subsection (a)(1) of this section shall result in a termination of the exemption or abatement as of the beginning of the tax year in which the report is required to be filed. If the report is not filed timely, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall assess a penalty of $250. This section shall not apply to a property owner that is required to file an annual report pursuant to § 47-1007.

(c)

Upon written application by the property owner filed on or before April 1 of any year, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing the report required under subsection (a) of this section. For reasonable cause, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may abate the penalty provided under subsection (b) of this section as well as the tax, penalty, and interest resulting from the failure to file the report timely.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7142(b), 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7157(b), 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 47-4703.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.
Section 13(b) of D.C. Law 19-53 amended the section to read as follows:
“§ 47-4702. Annual certification of continuing eligibility for exemptions and abatements from real property tax.
“(a) To the extent allowable by law, on or before April 1 of each year, beginning in 2012, and every year thereafter, any nonprofit organization or business entity owning property receiving a real property tax exemption or abatement pursuant to Chapter 10 (other than property exempt under § 47-1002(1), (2), (3), or (21)) or Chapter 46 of this title, regardless of when the exemption or abatement was received, shall be required to file an annual report, under oath, with the Office of the Chief Financial Officer providing:
“(1) The lot and square, parcel, or reservation number of the real property and certifying that the real property has been used during the preceding real property tax year for the purpose for which the exemption or abatement was granted; and
“(2) A description of the community benefits provided pursuant to the provisions of the act granting the tax exemption or abatement, or an update on the progress of the community benefits identified in the associated act granting the tax exemption or abatement.
“(b) Failure to certify that the property was still eligible for the exemption or abatement based on the use of the property as required by subsection (a)(1) of this section shall result in a termination of the exemption or abatement as of the beginning of the tax year in which the report is required to be filed. If the report is not filed timely, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall assess a penalty of $250. This section shall not apply to a property owner that is required to file an annual report pursuant to § 47-1007.
“(c) Upon written application by the property owner filed on or before April 1 of any year, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing the report required under subsection (a) of this section. For reasonable cause, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may abate the penalty provided under subsection (b) of this section as well as the tax, penalty, and interest resulting from the failure to file the report timely.”.
Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 19-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 108(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section to read as follows:
“§ 47-4702. Annual certification of continuing eligibility for exemptions and abatements from real property tax.
“(a) To the extent allowable by law, on or before April 1 of each year, beginning in 2012, and every year thereafter, any nonprofit organization or business entity owning property receiving a real property tax exemption or abatement pursuant to Chapter 10 (other than property exempt under § 47-1002(1), (2), (3), or (21)) or Chapter 46 of this title, regardless of when the exemption or abatement was received, shall be required to file an annual report, under oath, with the Office of the Chief Financial Officer providing:
“(1) The lot and square, parcel, or reservation number of the real property and certifying that the real property has been used during the preceding real property tax year for the purpose for which the exemption or abatement was granted; and
“(2) A description of the community benefits provided pursuant to the provisions of the act granting the tax exemption or abatement, or an update on the progress of the community benefits identified in the act granting the tax exemption or abatement.
“(b) Failure to certify that the property was still eligible for the exemption or abatement based on the use of the property as required by subsection (a)(1) of this section shall result in a termination of the exemption or abatement as of the beginning of the tax year in which the report is required to be filed. If the report is not filed timely, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall assess a penalty of $250. This section shall not apply to a property owner that is required to file an annual report pursuant to § 47-1007.
“(c) Upon written application by the property owner filed on or before April 1 of any year, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing the report required under subsection (a) of this section. For reasonable cause, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer may abate the penalty provided under subsection (b) of this section as well as the tax, penalty, and interest resulting from the failure to file the report timely.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(b) of Revised Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-157, October 4, 2011, 58 DCR 8688).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 108(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 108(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7157(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7157(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 7151 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle O of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Tax Clarification Amendment Act of 2013”.